Tennessee statutes. Title 5 Counties
Part 6

Revenue Commissioners [Repealed]

5-8-601. [Repealed.]

Acts 1907, ch. 602, § 76; Shan., § 935; Code 1932, § 1650; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-831; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 624, § 1, effective March 22, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§ 5-8-601—5-8-604 concerned revenue commissioners.

Acts 2016, Ch. 624, § 4, provided that nothing in the act, which repealed this part, shall remove an incumbent from office or abridge the term of any revenue commissioner prior to the end of the term for which the official was elected.

5-8-602. [Repealed.]

Acts 1907, ch. 602, § 76; Shan., § 936; Code 1932, § 1651; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-832; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 624, § 1, effective March 22, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§ 5-8-601—5-8-604 concerned revenue commissioners.

5-8-603. [Repealed.]

Acts 1907, ch. 602, § 76; Shan., § 937; Code 1932, § 1652; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-833; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 624, § 1, effective March 22, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§ 5-8-601—5-8-604 concerned revenue commissioners.

5-8-604. [Repealed.]

Acts 1907, ch. 602, § 76; Shan., § 938; Acts 1921, ch. 135, § 2; Code 1932, § 1653; Acts 1959, ch. 231, § 1; 1971, ch. 294, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 18, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 5-834; Acts 1984, ch. 509, §§ 1, 2; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 624, § 1, effective March 22, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§ 5-8-601—5-8-604 concerned revenue commissioners.